District of Columbia statutes.
7-171

Chief Clerk and Chief Inspector not to act as deputy.

After April 2, 1938, neither the Chief Clerk nor the Chief Inspector of the Department of Human Services of the District of Columbia shall act as a deputy to the Director of the Department of Human Services of said District.

History

July 14, 1892, 27 Stat. 162, ch. 171, § 1
April 2, 1938, 52 Stat. 153, ch. 60
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-107.
1973 Ed., § 6-108.

Editor's Notes

Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.